liblouis/share/liblouis/tables/_translation_zh-TW-g0.ctb
always \x6df9\x6c92 2345-3-134-126-5
always \x6e21\x5047 145-34-5-13-23456-5
always \x6e23\x5b50 1-345-3-125-156-1
always \x6e2c\x5ea6 245-2346-5-145-25-5
always \x6e2c\x91cf 245-2346-5-14-46-2
always \x6e38\x8aaa 234-2-24-1246-5
always \x6e6e\x6c92 2345-3-134-126-5
always \x6e6e\x6ec5 1456-3-134-346-5
always \x6e6f\x6e6f 24-1346-3-24-1346-3
always \x6ecb\x9577 125-156-3-1-1346-4
always \x6ed1\x7a3d 13-34-4-13-16-3
always \x6ef4\x7b54 145-16-3-145-345-3
always \x6f02\x4eae 1234-246-5-14-46-5
always \x6f02\x767d 1234-246-4-135-2456-2
always \x6f0f\x5b50 14-12356-5-125-156-1
always \x6f15\x904b 245-146-2-256-5
always \x6f2b\x5929 134-1236-2-124-2345-3
always \x6f8e\x6e43 1234-1356-3-1234-2456-5
always \x6fc0\x5c07 13-16-3-13-46-5
always \x6fdf\x5357 13-16-4-1345-1236-2
always \x707d\x96e3 125-2456-3-1345-1236-5
always \x70ae\x5f48 1234-146-5-145-1236-5
always \x70ae\x88fd 1234-146-2-1-156-5
always \x70b8\x5f48 1-345-5-145-1236-5
always \x70b8\x91ac 1-345-2-13-46-5
always \x70ba\x4e86 1246-5-14-2346-1
always \x70ba\x4ec0 1246-5-24-2346-2
always \x70ba\x4ed6 1246-5-124-345-3
always \x70ba\x4f55 1246-5-1235-2346-2
always \x70ba\x4f60 1246-5-1345-16-4
always \x70ba\x570b 1246-5-13-25-2
always \x70ba\x5979 1246-5-124-345-3
always \x70ba\x59b3 1246-5-1345-16-4
always \x70ba\x60a8 1246-5-1345-1456-2
always \x70ba\x6c11 1246-5-134-1456-2
always \x70ba\x864e 1246-5-1235-34-4
always \x70d9\x5370 14-146-5-1456-5
always \x70d9\x9435 14-146-5-124-346-4
always \x70d9\x9905 14-146-5-135-13456-4
always \x70f9\x8abf 1234-1356-3-124-246-2
always \x710a\x63a5 1235-1236-5-13-346-3
always \x710a\x689d 1235-1236-5-124-246-2
always \x7121\x7684 34-2-145-16-5
always \x7121\x7e2b 34-2-12345-1356-5
always \x7126\x6fdf 13-246-3-1-156-4
always \x715e\x4f4f 24-345-3-1-34-5
always \x715e\x8eca 24-345-3-12-2346-3
always \x7167\x61c9 1-146-5-13456-5
always \x7167\x76f8 1-146-5-15-46-5
always \x71ce\x539f 14-246-5-45-2
always \x71d5\x4eac 2345-3-13-13456-3
always \x71d5\x5b50 2345-5-125-156-1
always \x71df\x9577 13456-2-1-1346-4
always \x7210\x5b50 14-34-2-125-156-1
always \x722a\x5b50 1-35-4-125-156-1
always \x722a\x7259 1-146-4-23456-2
always \x7247\x5b50 1234-2345-5-125-156-1
always \x724c\x5b50 1234-2456-2-125-156-1
always \x725b\x4ed4 1345-234-2-125-2456-4
always \x7292\x52de 123-146-5-14-146-5
always \x729b\x725b 134-146-2-1345-234-2
always \x72af\x96e3 12345-1236-5-1345-1236-5
always \x72c0\x5b50 1-456-5-125-156-1
always \x72d7\x4ed4 13-12356-4-125-2456-4
always \x72e9\x7375 24-12356-5-14-346-5
always \x72fc\x85c9 14-1346-2-13-16-2
always \x72fc\x865f 14-1346-2-1235-146-2
always \x731b\x5c07 134-1356-4-13-46-5
always \x731c\x5ea6 245-2456-3-145-25-5
always \x7334\x5b50 1235-12356-2-125-156-1
always \x7343\x5b50 145-2456-3-125-156-1
always \x7345\x5b50 24-156-3-125-156-1
always \x7368\x8655 145-34-2-12-34-4
always \x7387\x5148 24-2356-5-15-2345-3
always \x7387\x5175 24-2356-5-135-13456-3
always \x7387\x540c 24-2356-5-124-12346-2
always \x7387\x5718 24-2356-5-124-12456-2
always \x7387\x5e2b 24-2356-5-24-156-3
always \x7387\x6027 24-2356-5-15-13456-5
always \x7387\x610f 24-2356-5-16-5
always \x7387\x7136 24-2356-5-1245-1236-2
always \x7387\x76f4 24-2356-5-1-156-2
always \x7387\x771f 24-2356-5-1-136-3
always \x7387\x773e 24-2356-5-1-12346-5
always \x7387\x8ecd 24-2356-5-13-256-3
always \x7387\x9818 24-2356-5-14-13456-4
always \x738b\x51a0 456-2-13-12456-3
always \x738b\x90fd 456-2-145-34-3
always \x73a9\x5473 12456-5-1246-5
always \x73a9\x5ffd 12456-5-1235-34-3
always \x73a9\x6cd5 12456-5-12345-345-4
always \x73e0\x5b50 1-34-3-125-156-1
always \x73ed\x5b50 135-1236-3-125-156-1
always \x73ed\x9577 135-1236-3-1-1346-4
always \x7405\x90aa 14-1346-2-346-2
always \x743a\x746f 12345-345-5-14-1236-2
always \x745c\x4f3d 1256-2-13-23456-3
always \x745f\x7e2e 15-2346-5-15-34-5
always \x74a7\x9084 135-16-5-1235-12456-2
always \x74f6\x585e 1234-13456-2-15-2456-3
always \x74f6\x5b50 1234-13456-2-125-156-1
always \x751a\x9ebc 24-2346-2-134-2346-1
always \x751f\x9084 24-1356-3-1235-12456-2
always \x751f\x9577 24-1356-3-1-1346-4
always \x752f\x621a 1345-13456-2-245-16-3
always \x755c\x7267 15-1256-5-134-34-5
always \x755c\x7522 15-1256-5-12-1236-4
always \x755c\x7a4d 15-1256-5-13-16-3
always \x755c\x8b00 15-1256-5-134-12356-2
always \x755c\x990a 15-1256-5-46-4
always \x7576\x5dee 145-1346-3-12-2456-3
always \x7576\x6389 145-1346-5-145-246-5
always \x7576\x6a5f 145-1346-5-13-16-3
always \x7576\x7576 145-1346-5-145-1346-5
always \x7576\x7968 145-1346-5-1234-246-5
always \x7576\x8eca 145-1346-3-13-1256-3
always \x7576\x92ea 145-1346-5-1234-34-5
always \x7599\x7629 13-2346-3-145-345-1
always \x75b9\x5b50 1-136-4-125-156-1
always \x75c0\x50c2 13-1256-3-14-12356-2
always \x75c5\x5047 135-13456-5-13-23456-5
always \x75db\x60e1 124-12346-5-34-5
always \x75f1\x5b50 12345-356-5-125-156-1
always \x760b\x5b50 12345-1356-3-125-156-1
always \x7626\x524a 24-12356-5-15-236-3
always \x7626\x5b50 24-12356-5-125-156-1
always \x7638\x5b50 245-236-2-125-156-1
always \x7656\x597d 1234-16-4-1235-146-5
always \x7669\x5b50 14-2456-5-125-156-1
always \x767c\x9084 12345-345-3-1235-12456-2
always \x767c\x96e3 12345-345-3-1345-1236-5
always \x767d\x5377 135-2456-2-13-45-5
always \x767e\x4e58 135-2456-4-24-1356-5
always \x767e\x4e86 135-2456-4-14-246-4
always \x7687\x51a0 1235-456-2-13-12456-3
always \x768b\x9676 13-146-3-246-2
always \x76ae\x76f8 1234-16-2-15-46-5
always \x76c6\x5b50 1234-136-2-125-156-1
always \x76d2\x5b50 1235-2346-2-125-156-1
always \x76e4\x5b50 1234-1236-2-125-156-1
always \x76ee\x7684 134-34-5-145-16-5
always \x76f4\x7387 1-156-2-24-2356-5
always \x76f8\x4f4d 15-46-5-1246-5
always \x76f8\x5055 15-46-3-13-346-3
always \x76f8\x570b 15-46-5-13-25-2
always \x76f8\x592b 15-46-5-12345-34-3
always \x76f8\x61c9 15-46-3-13456-5
always \x76f8\x6a5f 15-46-5-13-16-3
always \x76f8\x7247 15-46-5-1234-2345-5
always \x76f8\x7387 15-46-3-24-2356-5
always \x76f8\x7a31 15-46-3-12-136-5
always \x76f8\x7c3f 15-46-5-135-34-5
always \x76f8\x8072 15-46-5-24-1356-3
always \x76f8\x8655 15-46-3-12-34-4
always \x76f8\x8853 15-46-5-24-34-5
always \x76f8\x8c8c 15-46-5-134-146-5
always \x76f8\x9762 15-46-5-134-2345-5
always \x7701\x5206 24-1356-4-12345-136-5
always \x7701\x5bdf 15-13456-4-12-345-2
always \x7701\x601d 15-13456-4-15-156-3
always \x7701\x609f 15-13456-4-34-5
always \x7701\x89aa 15-13456-4-245-1456-3
always \x7701\x9577 24-1356-4-1-1346-4
always \x770b\x4e2d 123-1236-5-1-12346-5
always \x770b\x5b88 123-1236-3-24-12356-4
always \x770b\x5bb6 123-1236-3-13-23456-3
always \x770b\x76f8 123-1236-5-15-46-5
always \x770b\x7ba1 123-1236-3-13-12456-4
always \x770b\x8b77 123-1236-3-1235-34-5
always \x770b\x9580 123-1236-3-134-136-2
always \x771f\x7387 1-136-3-24-2356-5
always \x771f\x76f8 1-136-3-15-46-5
always \x7738\x5b50 134-12356-2-125-156-1
always \x773c\x6688 2345-4-256-5
always \x773c\x7736 2345-4-123-456-3
always \x7761\x8457 24-1246-5-1-146-2
always \x7761\x89ba 24-1246-5-13-246-5
always \x7763\x7387 145-34-3-24-2356-5
always \x778e\x5b50 15-23456-3-125-156-1
always \x77ad\x671b 14-246-5-456-5
always \x77e5\x4e86 1-156-3-14-246-4
always \x77ee\x5b50 2456-4-125-156-1
always \x77f3\x5b50 24-156-2-125-156-1
always \x77f3\x8108 24-156-2-134-2456-5
always \x7802\x5b50 24-345-3-125-156-1
always \x780d\x4f10 123-1236-4-12345-345-3
always \x7832\x5f48 1234-146-5-145-1236-5
always \x7834\x76f8 1234-126-5-15-46-5
always \x7891\x5e16 135-356-3-124-346-5
always \x789f\x5b50 145-346-2-125-156-1
always \x78bc\x5b50 134-345-4-125-156-1
always \x78c5\x7921 1234-1346-3-135-126-2
always \x78e8\x96e3 134-126-2-1345-1236-5
always \x7926\x8108 123-456-5-134-2456-5
always \x793e\x9577 24-2346-5-1-1346-4
always \x7957\x6709 1-156-4-234-4
always \x7957\x80fd 1-156-4-1345-1356-2
always \x7957\x8981 1-156-4-246-5
always \x795e\x7947 24-136-2-245-16-2
always \x7968\x5b50 1234-246-5-125-156-1
always \x7981\x4e0d 13-1456-3-135-34-5
always \x798f\x76f8 12345-34-2-15-46-5
always \x79aa\x8b93 24-1236-5-1245-1346-5
always \x79ae\x6a02 14-16-4-236-5
always \x79bf\x5b50 124-34-3-125-156-1
always \x79d1\x9577 123-2346-3-1-1346-4
always \x7a2e\x690d 1-12346-5-1-156-2
always \x7a2e\x6a39 1-12346-5-24-34-5
always \x7a31\x5fc3 12-136-5-15-1456-3
always \x7a31\x610f 12-136-5-16-5
always \x7a3b\x5b50 145-146-5-125-156-1
always \x7a3f\x5b50 13-146-4-125-156-1
always \x7a40\x5b50 13-34-4-125-156-1
always \x7a4d\x7d2f 13-16-3-14-356-4
always \x7a69\x7576 123456-4-145-1346-5
always \x7a7a\x5730 123-12346-5-145-16-5
always \x7a7a\x683c 123-12346-5-13-2346-2
always \x7a7a\x9592 123-12346-5-15-2345-2
always \x7a7a\x9699 123-12346-5-15-16-5
always \x7a7a\x96e3 123-12346-3-1345-1236-5
always \x7a7a\x984d 123-12346-5-2346-2
always \x7a7f\x8457 12-12456-3-1-25-2
always \x7a97\x5b50 12-456-3-125-156-1
always \x7aae\x76f8 245-235-2-15-46-5
always \x7aaf\x5b50 246-2-125-156-1
always \x7ad9\x9577 1-1236-5-1-1346-4
always \x7b1b\x5b50 145-16-2-125-156-1
always \x7b26\x61c9 12345-34-2-13456-5
always \x7b46\x4f10 135-16-4-12345-345-3
always \x7b49\x5206 145-1356-4-12345-136-5
always \x7b54\x61c9 145-345-3-13456-5
always \x7b54\x7406 145-345-3-14-16-4
always \x7b54\x7b54 145-345-3-145-345-3
always \x7b56\x61c9 245-2346-5-13456-5
always \x7b77\x5b50 123-2356-5-125-156-1
always \x7ba1\x5b50 13-12456-4-125-156-1
always \x7ba1\x6a02 13-12456-4-236-5
always \x7bad\x93c3 13-2345-5-245-34-5
always \x7bb1\x5b50 15-46-3-125-156-1
always \x7be9\x5b50 24-2456-3-125-156-1
always \x7c1e\x98df 145-1236-3-15-156-5
always \x7c2a\x5b50 125-1236-3-125-156-1
always \x7c3d\x7f72 245-2345-3-24-34-5
always \x7c3e\x5b50 14-2345-2-125-156-1
always \x7c3f\x5b50 135-34-5-125-156-1
always \x7c43\x5b50 14-1236-2-125-156-1
always \x7c4d\x6c92 13-16-2-134-126-5
always \x7c60\x5b50 14-12346-2-125-156-1
always \x7c73\x884c 134-16-4-1235-1346-2
always \x7c97\x7377 245-34-3-123-456-5
always \x7c97\x7387 245-34-3-24-2356-5
always \x7c98\x8cbc 1-1236-3-124-346-3
always \x7cbd\x5b50 125-12346-5-125-156-1
always \x7cd9\x7c73 245-146-5-134-16-4
always \x7cf0\x5b50 124-12456-2-125-156-1
always \x7d00\x50b3 13-16-5-1-12456-5
always \x7d13\x96e3 24-34-3-1345-1236-5
always \x7d20\x884c 15-34-5-15-13456-5
always \x7d2f\x4e16 14-356-4-24-156-5
always \x7d2f\x52a0 14-356-4-13-23456-3
always \x7d2f\x5375 14-356-4-14-12456-4
always \x7d2f\x5b98 14-356-4-13-12456-3
always \x7d2f\x65e5 14-356-4-1245-156-5
always \x7d2f\x6708 14-356-4-236-5
always \x7d2f\x6b21 14-356-4-245-156-5
always \x7d2f\x72af 14-356-4-12345-1236-5
always \x7d2f\x7a4d 14-356-4-13-16-3
always \x7d2f\x7d2f 14-356-4-14-356-4
always \x7d2f\x8d05 14-356-4-1-1246-5
always \x7d2f\x9032 14-356-4-13-1456-5
always \x7d42\x4e86 1-12346-3-14-246-4
always \x7d44\x9577 125-34-4-1-1346-4
always \x7d50\x5be6 13-346-3-24-156-2
always \x7d50\x5df4 13-346-3-135-345-3
always \x7d66\x4ed8 13-16-4-12345-34-5
always \x7d68\x5462 1245-12346-2-1345-16-2
always \x7d71\x7387 124-12346-4-24-2356-5
always \x7d93\x50b3 13-13456-3-1-12456-5
always \x7d93\x8108 13-13456-3-134-2456-5
always \x7db2\x5b50 456-4-125-156-1
always \x7db8\x5dfe 13-12456-3-13-1456-3
always \x7de3\x5206 45-2-12345-136-5
always \x7de8\x8457 135-2345-3-1-34-5
always \x7e23\x5206 15-2345-5-12345-136-5
always \x7e23\x9577 15-2345-5-1-1346-4
always \x7e2b\x9699 12345-1356-5-15-16-5
always \x7e31\x6a6b 125-12346-3-1235-1356-2
always \x7e31\x8cab 125-12346-3-13-12456-5
always \x7e3d\x5f97 125-12346-4-145-356-4
always \x7e3d\x884c 125-12346-4-1235-1346-2
always \x7e3d\x9577 125-12346-4-1-1346-4
always \x7e43\x5b50 135-1356-3-125-156-1
always \x7e69\x5b50 24-1356-2-125-156-1
always \x7e8c\x5047 15-1256-5-13-23456-5
always \x7f3a\x7a7a 245-236-3-123-12346-5
always \x7f48\x5b50 124-1236-2-125-156-1
always \x7f50\x5b50 13-12456-5-125-156-1
always \x7f69\x5b50 1-146-5-125-156-1
always \x7f72\x540d 24-34-5-134-13456-2
always \x7f79\x96e3 14-16-2-1345-1236-5
always \x7f9e\x602f 15-234-3-245-236-5
always \x7f9e\x60e1 15-234-3-34-5
always \x7fa9\x884c 16-5-15-13456-5
always \x7ff9\x695a 245-246-2-12-34-4
always \x7ff9\x9996 245-246-2-24-12356-4
